Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2824.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97C.395, is amended to read: 97C.395 OPEN SEASONS FOR ANGLING. Subdivision 1. Dates for certain species. (a) The open seasons to take fish by angling are as follows: (1) for walleye, sauger, northern pike,new text begin andnew text end muskellunge, deleted text begin largemouth bass, and smallmouth bass,deleted text end the Saturday two weeks prior to the Saturday of Memorial Day weekend through the last Sunday in February; (2) for brown trout, brook trout, lake trout, rainbow trout, and splake, between January 1 through October 31 as prescribed by the commissioner by rule except as provided in section 97C.415, subdivision 2; and (3) for salmon, as prescribed by the commissioner by rule. (b) The commissioner shall close the season in areas of the state where fish are spawning and closing the season will protect the resource. Subd. 2. Continuous season for certain species. Fornew text begin largemouth bass, smallmouth bass,new text end sunfish, white crappie, black crappie, yellow perch, channel catfish, rock bass, white bass, yellow bass, burbot, cisco (tullibee), lake whitefish, common carp, and native rough fish, the open season is continuous.